apertium-sux.sux.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Sumerian 
 


# =========================================================

# 1. Verb

PATTERNS 
VerbRoot


# =========================================================

# 2. Noun

PATTERNS 
NounRoot



# =========================================================

# 3. Named Entity PATTERNS

PATTERNS 
Named_Entities



# =========================================================

# 4. Numbers

PATTERNS 
Numbers


# =========================================================

# 5. Coordinative Conjugations

PATTERNS 
Conjugation








###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################








#=============================================================
LEXICON VerbRoot
